Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,130.07
Historical vehicles; registered and licensed on August 24, 1975; how treated.

Collectors who, on August 24, 1975, had vehicles registered and licensed as historical vehicles shall be permitted to retain such registration and license if the collector submits an affidavit to the department sworn to by the vehicle owner that the vehicle is being collected, preserved, restored, and maintained as a hobby and not for the general use of the vehicle.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 31.